en: Accessories
ar: إكسسوارات
az: Aksesuarlar
bg: Аксесоари
bn: আনুষাঙ্গিক
ca: Accessoris
cs: Příslušenství
da: Tilbehør
de: Zubehör
el: Αξεσουάρ
es: Accesorios
et: Tarvikud
fa: لوازم جانبی
fi: Lisätarvikkeet
fr: Accessoires
ga: Gabhálais
he: אביזרים
hr: Pribor
hu: Kiegészítők
hy: Պարագաներ
id: Aksesori
is: Aukahlutir
it: Accessori
ja: アクセサリー
ka: აქსესუარები
kk: Аксессуарлар
km: គ្រឿងបន្លាស់
ko: 액세서리
ky: Аксессуарлар
lt: Priedai
lv: Aksesuāri
mk: Додатоци
ms: Aksesori
mt: Aċċessorji
nl: Accessoires
no: Tilbehør
pl: Akcesoria
pt: Acessórios
ro: Accesorii
ru: Аксессуары
sk: Príslušenstvo
sl: Dodatki
sq: Aksesorë
sr: Додатна опрема
sv: Tillbehör
sw: Vifaa
tg: Лавозимот
th: เครื่องประดับ
tk: Esbaplar
tr: Aksesuarlar
uk: Аксесуари
ur: لوازمات
uz: Aksessuarlar
vi: Phụ kiện
zh: 配件

en: Tablets
de: Tabletten
es: Pastillas, Comprimidos
fr: Comprimés à avaler
it: Compresse
nl: Tabletten, Pillen
pt: Comprimidos, Pastilhas

en: Razors
ar: شفرات حلاقة
az: Ülgüclər
bg: Бръсначи
cs: Holicí strojky
da: Barberskrabere
de: Rasierer
el: Ξυραφάκια
es: Maquinillas de afeitar
et: Žiletid
fa: خودتراش
fi: Partahöylät
fr: Rasoirs
ga: Rásúir
hr: Britvice
hu: Borotvák
hy: Սափրվելու ածելիներ
id: Alat cukur
is: Rakvélar
it: Rasoi
ja: カミソリ
ka: საპარსები
kk: Ұстаралар
ko: 면도기
ky: Сакал алгычтар
lt: Skustuvai
lv: Skuvekļi
mk: Брич
ms: Pisau cukur
mt: Imwieħ
nl: Scheermessen
no: Barberhøvler
pl: Maszynki do golenia
pt: Navalhas
ro: Aparate de ras
ru: Бритвы
sk: Holiace strojčeky
sl: Britvice
sq: Brisk
sr: Бриjaчи
sv: Rakhyvlar
sw: Wembe
tg: Теғҳои тарошидан
th: มีดโกน
tk: Pyçaklar
uk: Бритви
uz: Ustara
vi: Dao cạo râu
zh: 剃须刀

en: Razor blades, razorblades
ar: شفرات الحلاقة
az: Ülgüc ülgücləri
bg: Ножчета за бръснене
cs: Žiletky
da: Barberblade
de: Rasierklingen
el: Λεπίδες ξυραφιού
es: Hojas de afeitar
et: Žiletiterad
fa: تیغ های ریش تراش
fi: Partaterät
fr: Lames de rasoir
ga: Lannaí rásúir
hr: Oštrice za brijanje
hu: Penge
hy: Սափրվելու շեղբեր
id: Pisau cukur
is: Rakvélarblöð
it: Lamette da barba
ja: カミソリの刃
ka: საპარსი პირები
kk: Ұстара жүздері
ko: 면도날
ky: Сакал алгычтын бычактары
lt: Skutimosi peiliukai
lv: Skuvekļu asmeņi
mk: Сечила за бричење
ms: Bilah pisau cukur
mt: Xfafar tal-leħja
nl: Scheermesjes
no: Barberblad
pl: Ostrza do golenia
pt: Lâminas de barbear
ro: Lame de ras
ru: Лезвия для бритья
sk: Žiletky
sl: Rezila za britje
sq: Tehe brisk
sr: Сечива за бријање
sv: Rakblad
sw: Visu vya wembe
tg: Теғҳои устара
th: ใบมีดโกน
tk: Pyçaklary syrmak
uk: Леза для гоління
uz: Ustaralar
vi: Lưỡi dao cạo
zh: 剃须刀片

en: Moist wipes
ar: مناديل مبللة
az: Nəm salfetlər
bg: Мокри кърпички
bn: ভেজা ওয়াইপ
ca: Tovalloletes humides
cs: Vlhčené ubrousky
da: Vådservietter
de: Feuchttücher
el: Υγρά μαντηλάκια
es: Toallitas húmedas
et: Niisked salvrätikud
fa: دستمال مرطوب
fi: Kosteuspyyhkeet
fr: Lingettes imprégnées
ga: Tuáillíní fliucha
he: מגבונים לחים
hr: Vlažne maramice
hu: Nedves törlőkendők
hy: Թաց անձեռոցիկներ
id: Tisu basah
it: Salviette umidificate
ja: ウェットティッシュ
ka: სველი ხელსახოცები
kk: Дымқыл майлықтар
km: ក្រណាត់សើម
ko: 물티슈
ky: Нымдуу салфеткалар
lt: Drėgnos servetėlės
lv: Mitrās salvetes
mk: Влажни марамчиња
ms: Tisu basah
mt: Wipes niedja
nl: Vochtige doekjes
no: Våtservietter
pl: Chusteczki nawilżane
pt: Toalhetes húmidos
ro: Șervețele umede
ru: Влажные салфетки
sk: Vlhčené utierky
sl: Vlažilni robčki
sq: Pëlhura të lagura
sr: Влажне марамице
sv: Våtservetter
sw: Vifuta maji
tg: Салфеткаҳои тар
th: ผ้าเปียก
tk: Çygly süpürgiçler
tr: Islak mendil
uk: Вологі серветки
ur: نم مسح
uz: Nam salfetkalar
vi: Khăn ướt
zh: 湿巾

en: Condoms
ar: واقي ذكري
az: Kondomlar
bg: Презервативи
cs: Kondomy
da: Kondomer
de: Kondome
el: Προφυλακτικά
es: Condones
et: Kondoomid
fa: کاندوم
fi: Kondomit
fr: Préservatifs
ga: Coiscíní
hr: Kondomi
hu: Óvszerek
hy: Պահպանակներ
id: Kondom
is: smokkur
it: Preservativi
ja: コンドーム
ka: კონდომები
kk: Мүшеқаптар
ko: 콘돔
ky: Презервативдер
lt: Prezervatyvai
lv: Prezervatīvi
mk: Кондоми
ms: Kondom
mt: Kondoms
nl: Condooms
no: Kondomer
pl: Prezerwatywy
pt: Preservativos
ro: Prezervative
ru: Презервативы
sk: Kondómy
sl: Kondomi
sq: Prezervativë
sr: Кондоми
sv: Kondomer
sw: Kondomu
tg: Презервативҳо
th: ถุงยางอนามัย
tk: Prezerwatiwler
tr: Kondom
uk: Презервативи
uz: Prezervativlar
vi: Bao cao su
zh: 安全套

en: Male condoms
ar: واقي ذكري للرجال
az: Kişi prezervativləri
bg: Мъжки презервативи
cs: Pánské kondomy
da: Mandlige kondomer
de: Männliche Kondome
el: Ανδρικά προφυλακτικά
es: Condones masculinos
et: Meeste kondoomid
fa: کاندوم مردانه
fi: Miesten kondomit
fr: Préservatifs masculins
ga: Coiscíní fireann
hr: Muški kondomi
hu: Férfi óvszerek
hy: Տղամարդու պահպանակներ
id: Kondom pria
is: Karlkyns smokkar
it: Preservativi maschili
ja: 男性用コンドーム
ka: მამაკაცის კონდომები
kk: Ерлерге арналған мүшеқаптар
ko: 남성용 콘돔
ky: Эркектер үчүн презервативдер
lt: Vyriški prezervatyvai
lv: Vīriešu prezervatīvi
mk: Машки кондоми
ms: Kondom lelaki
mt: Kondoms maskili
nl: Mannelijke condooms
no: Manlige kondomer
pl: Prezerwatywy męskie
pt: Preservativos masculinos
ro: Prezervative masculine
ru: Мужские презервативы
sk: Pánske kondómy
sl: Moški kondomi
sq: Prezervativë për meshkuj
sr: Мушки кондоми
sv: Manliga kondomer
sw: Kondomu za kiume
tg: Презервативҳои мардона
th: ถุงยางอนามัยชาย
tk: Erkek prezerwatiwleri
tr: Erkek kondomları
uk: Чоловічі презервативи
uz: Erkak prezervativlari
vi: Bao cao su nam
zh: 男用避孕套

en: Female condoms
ar: واقي ذكري نسائي
az: Qadın prezervativləri
bg: Женски презервативи
cs: Dámské kondomy
da: Kvindelige kondomer
de: Weibliche Kondome
el: Γυναικεία προφυλακτικά
es: Condones femeninos
et: Naiste kondoomid
fa: کاندوم زنانه
fi: Naisten kondomit
fr: Préservatifs féminins
ga: Coiscíní baineann
hr: Ženski kondomi
hu: Női óvszerek
hy: Կանացի պահպանակներ
id: Kondom wanita
is: Kvenkyns smokkar
it: Preservativi femminili
ja: 女性用コンドーム
ka: ქალის კონდომები
kk: Әйелдерге арналған мүшеқаптар
ko: 여성용 콘돔
ky: Аялдар үчүн презервативдер
lt: Moteriški prezervatyvai
lv: Sieviešu prezervatīvi
mk: Женски кондоми
ms: Kondom wanita
mt: Kondoms femminili
nl: Vrouwelijke condooms
no: Kvinnekondomer
pl: Prezerwatywy damskie
pt: Preservativos femininos
ro: Prezervative feminine
ru: Женские презервативы
sk: Dámske kondómy
sl: Ženski kondomi
sq: Prezervativë femra
sr: Женски кондоми
sv: Kvinnliga kondomer
sw: Kondomu za kike
tg: Презервативҳои занона
th: ถุงยางอนามัยสำหรับผู้หญิง
tk: Aýal prezerwatiwleri
tr: Kadın kondomları
uk: Жіночі презервативи
uz: Ayollar prezervativlari
vi: Bao cao su nữ
zh: 女性安全套

en: Personal lubricants, Lubricating gels, lubricants, lubes
ar: مواد تشحيم ، جل تزليق
az: Yağlayıcı gellər, sürtkü yağları
bg: Смазочни гелове, лубриканти
cs: Lubrikační gely, Lubrikanty
da: Glidecremer, Smøremidler, smøregeler
de: Gleitmittel, Gleitgele, Schmiermittel
el: Λιπαντικά τζελ, λιπαντικά
es: Lubricantes íntimos, Geles lubricantes, lubricantes
et: Libestavad geelid, määrdeained
fa: ژل های روان کننده، روان کننده ها
fi: Liukuvoiteet, liukasteet
fr: Lubrifiants personnels, Gels lubrifiants, lubrifiants
ga: Gels bealaithe, bealaí
hr: Lubrikantni gelovi, lubrikanti
hu: Síkosító gélek, kenőanyagok
hy: Քսող գելեր, քսանյութեր
id: Gel pelumas, pelumas
is: Smurningshlaup, smurefni
it: Lubrificanti personali, Gel lubrificanti, lubrificanti
ja: 潤滑ゼリー・ローション, 潤滑剤、潤滑剤ゲル
ka: საპოხი გელები, საპოხი მასალები
kk: Майлау гельдері, майлағыштар
ko: 윤활 젤, 윤활제
ky: Майлоочу гельдер, майлоочу майлар
lt: Lubrikantai, tepalai
lv: Smērvielas, smērvielu želejas
mk: Лубрикантни гелови, лубриканти
ms: Gel pelincir, pelincir
mt: Ġellijiet lubrifikanti, lubrifikanti
nb: Glidemidler, Smøremidler, smøregeler
nl: Glijmiddelen
pl: Żele intymne, Żele nawilżające, lubrykanty
pt: Lubrificantes pessoais, Géis lubrificantes, lubrificantes
ro: Geluri lubrifiante, lubrifianți
ru: Гигиенические смазки, Смазочные гели, смазки
sk: Lubrikačné gély, lubrikanty
sl: Mazalni geli, maziva
sq: Xhel lubrifikantë, lubrifikantë
sr: Лубрикантни гелови, лубриканти
sv: Glidmedel, Smörjmedel
sw: Geli za kulainisha, vilainishi
tg: Гелҳои молиданӣ, равғанҳои молиданӣ
th: เจลหล่อลื่น, สารหล่อลื่น
tk: Ýaglaýjy geller, ýaglaýjylar
tr: Kayganlaştırıcılar, Kayganlaştırıcı jeller, kaydırıcılar
uk: Змащувальні гелі, мастила
uz: Moylash gellari, moylash materiallari
vi: Gel bôi trơn, chất bôi trơn
zh: 润滑凝胶、润滑剂

en: Massage candle
ar: شمعة التدليك
az: Masaj şamı
bg: Свещ за масаж
cs: Masážní svíčka
da: Massage stearinlys
de: Massagekerze
el: Κερί μασάζ
es: Vela de masaje
et: Massaažiküünal
fa: شمع ماساژ
fi: Hierontakynttilä
fr: Bougie pour massage
ga: Coinneal suathaireachta
hr: Svijeća za masažu
hu: Masszázs gyertya
hy: Մերսման մոմ
id: Lilin pijat
is: Nuddkerti
it: Candela da massaggio
ja: マッサージキャンドル
ka: მასაჟის სანთელი
kk: Массаж шамы
ko: 마사지 양초
ky: Массаж шам
lt: Masažinė žvakė
lv: Masāžas svece
mk: Свеќа за масажа
ms: Lilin urut
mt: Xemgħa tal-massaġġi
nl: Massagekaars
no: Massasjelys
pl: Świeca do masażu
pt: Vela de massagem
ro: Lumânare de masaj
ru: Свеча для массажа
sk: Masážna sviečka
sl: Masažna sveča
sq: Qiri masazhi
sr: Свећа за масажу
sv: Massageljus
sw: Mshumaa wa masaji
tg: Шамъи массаж
th: เทียนนวด
tk: Massaž şemi
tr: Masaj mumu
uk: Свічка для масажу
uz: Massaj sham
vi: Nến massage
zh: 按摩蜡烛

en: Baby wipes
ar: مناديل مبللة للأطفال
az: Uşaq salfetləri
bg: Бебешки мокри кърпички
bn: বেবি ওয়াইপ
ca: Tovalloletes per a nadons
cs: Dětské vlhčené ubrousky
da: Vådservietter til babyer
de: Feuchttücher für Babys
el: Μωρομάντηλα
es: Toallitas húmedas para bebés
et: Niisked salvrätikud beebidele
fa: دستمال مرطوب کودک
fi: Vauvojen kosteuspyyhkeet
fr: Lingettes pour bébé, Lingettes bébé, Lingettes bébés, Lingette bébé
ga: Tuáillíní fliucha do leanaí
he: מגבונים לחים לתינוקות
hr: Vlažne maramice za bebe
hu: Babatörlőkendők
hy: Մանկական թաց անձեռոցիկներ
id: Tisu basah bayi
it: Salviettine umidificate per bambini
ja: ベビーワイプ
ka: ბავშვის სველი ხელსახოცები
kk: Балаларға арналған дымқыл майлықтар
km: ក្រណាត់សើមសម្រាប់ទារក
ko: 아기 물티슈
ky: Ымыркайлар үчүн нымдуу салфеткалар
lt: Drėgnos servetėlės kūdikiams
lv: Mitrās salvetes zīdaiņiem
mk: Влажни марамчиња за бебиња
ms: Tisu basah bayi
mt: Wipes niedja tat-trabi
nl: Babydoekjes
no: Våtservietter for babyer
pl: Chusteczki nawilżane dla dzieci
pt: Toalhetes húmidos para bebés
ro: Șervețele umede pentru bebeluși
ru: Детские влажные салфетки
sk: Vlhčené utierky pre deti
sl: Vlažilni robčki za dojenčke
sq: Pëlhura të lagura për fëmijë
sr: Влажне марамице за бебе
sv: Våtservetter för barn
sw: Vifuta vya watoto
tg: Салфеткаҳои тар барои кӯдакон
th: ผ้าเปียกสำหรับเด็ก
tk: Balamyjyklar üçin çygly süpürgiçler
tr: Bebek mendilleri
uk: Вологі серветки для дітей
ur: بچوں کے لیے گیلے مسح
uz: Bolalar uchun nam salfetkalar
vi: Khăn ướt cho bé
zh: 婴儿湿巾

en: Cotton buds, Cotton swabs
da: Vatpinde
de: Wattestäbchen, Ohrenstäbchen
es: Bastoncillos de algodón, Hisopos de algodón
fr: Cotons-tiges, Coton-tige, Bâtonnets ouatés
it: Bastoncini cotonati, Cotton fioc
nb: Bomullspinner
nl: Wattenstaafjes
pt: Cotonetes, Hastes flexíveis
sv: Bomullspinnar

en: Petroleum jellies, Vaseline
fr: Vaselines, Vaseline
sv: Petroleumgeléer, Vaselin

en: Halloween cosmetics, Halloween makeup, Halloween products, Halloween supplies
xx: Halloween-makeup
de: Halloween-Kosmetik, Halloween-Make-up
es: Cosméticos de Halloween, Maquillaje de Halloween
fr: Maquillage d'Halloween, Cosmétiques d'Halloween
it: Cosmetici per Halloween, Trucco per Halloween
nl: Halloween cosmetica, Halloween make-up
pt: Cosméticos de Halloween, Maquiagem de Halloween